Montana, session 2025, SB49.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Restrictions on disciplinary proceedings. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (3), a judicial officer may not initiate or conduct any professional disciplinary proceedings or take
any disciplinary measures against an attorney who serves as a constitutional officer as defined in 2-6-1002 or
as a member of the legislature for actions taken by the attorney during the attorney's term of public office THAT
COULD DETER, RETALIATE AGAINST, OR PREVENT THE LAWFUL EXERCISE OF THE ATTORNEY'S CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS
OR WOULD OTHERWISE IMPEDE THE FAITHFUL EXECUTION OF OFFICE.
(2) A judicial officer is barred from conducting proceedings described in subsection (1) after the
attorney leaves office if the basis for the proceeding arises while the attorney is in office.
(3) A judge or justice of the peace may take disciplinary measures against an attorney identified in
subsection (1) for courtroom behavior that disrupts a judicial proceeding.
(4) IF PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINARY PROCEEDINGS ARE INITIATED AGAINST AN ATTORNEY SERVING AS A
CONSTITUTIONAL OFFICER OR MEMBER OF THE LEGISLATURE, THAT INDIVIDUAL MAY FILE A MOTION TO DISMISS OR A
MOTION TO QUASH UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4)(5) For the purposes of this section, "judicial officer" means a judge, a justice of the peace, a
supreme court justice, any court of law, the office of disciplinary counsel, and the commission on practice.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 3, chapter 1, part 6, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 1, part 6, apply to [section 1].


NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date .. [This act] is effective on passage and approval ..


NEW SECTION. Section 3. Retroactive a pplicability .. [This act] applies retroactively, within the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 49

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0049.3
meaning of 1-2-109, to any disciplinary proceedings occurring on or after January 1, 2024.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 49